Connecticut, session 2026, HB05186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to (1) establish a one
LCO No. 946 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 5186
percentage point surcharge on the tax imposed under chapter 228z of
the general statutes, (2) reduce the credit allowed against said tax, for
filers subject to the highest marginal rate under section 12-700 of the
general statutes, to eighty-three and six-tenths per cent, (3) increase the
credit allowed against said tax, for filers subject to the three lowest
marginal rates under section 12-700 of the general statutes, to ninety-
three and one-hundredths per cent, and (4) establish a ten per cent
surcharge on the amount of the qualified business income deduction
claimed for federal income tax purposes by filers subject to the highest
marginal rate under section 12-700 of the general statutes.